Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-30] Net gain in recovery of
species. All habitat conservation plans, safe harbor agreements,
incidental take licenses, and subsequent actions authorized under those plans,
agreements, and licenses shall be designed to result in an overall net gain in
the recovery of Hawaii's threatened and endangered species. [L 1997, c 380, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next